Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1902
Nebraska Tree Recovery Program; legislative intent; administration; rules and regulations.

It is the intent of the Legislature that two hundred fifty thousand dollars be appropriated from the General Fund for fiscal year 1994-95 for a program to fund tree removal, disposal, and replacement costs. The Nebraska Forest Service of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources Department of Forestry, Fisheries and Wildlife shall administer the program through a grant process, and the program shall be known as the Nebraska Tree Recovery Program. The Nebraska Community Forestry Council shall act as an advisory body in administration of the program. The service shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 72-1901 to 72-1904.

Laws 1994, LB 695, § 2.